Hawaii statutes.
[§474-2] Business action center
established; staff. (a) There is established within the department a
business action center that shall provide information and services to
coordinate, simplify, and expedite permit application processing for persons
engaged in or intending to engage in business activities in the State. The
center shall assist in the development of neighbor island operations that
deliver similar services. The center shall also serve as an information
clearinghouse that makes available to any person general information about
state and federal laws and rules, county ordinances and rules, and financial
assistance programs related to business activities.

(b) The center shall be headed by a supervisor
who shall be appointed by the director without regard to chapter 76 and shall
serve at the director's pleasure. The director may employ such other personnel
as are required to carry out the functions of the center under this chapter. [L
2005, c 62, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next